South Carolina, session 2025-2026, S779.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of South Carolina: Legislative expense allowance SECTION 1.    All members of the 126th South Carolina General Assembly shall receive a legislative expense allowance of one thousand dollars per month. The provisions of this section are retroactive to July 1, 2025. Eligibility SECTION 2.    If a member of the General Assembly vacates or vacated his seat during Fiscal Year 2025-2026, then the member is entitled to receive a legislative expense allowance pursuant to SECTION 1 for only the months that the member served. A member elected in a special election to fill a vacancy is entitled to receive a legislative expense allowance for only those months during Fiscal Year 2025-2026 after he took the oath of office, including a prorated amount for the month in which he took the oath of office. A member who was convicted of, plead guilty, or plead nolo contendere to a felony during the fiscal year and prior to the effective date of this act is not entitled to receive a legislative expense allowance. Severability SECTION 3.    If any section, subsection, paragraph, subparagraph, sentence, clause, phrase, or word of this act is for any reason held to be unconstitutional or invalid, such holding shall not affect the constitutionality or validity of the remaining portions of this act, the General Assembly hereby declaring that it would have passed this act, and each and every section, subsection, paragraph, subparagraph, sentence, clause, phrase, and word thereof, irrespective of the fact that any one or more other sections, subsections, paragraphs, subparagraphs, sentences, clauses, phrases, or words hereof may be declared to be unconstitutional, invalid, or otherwise ineffective. Time effective SECTION 4.    This joint resolution takes effect upon approval by the Governor and is repealed on July 1, 2026. Ratified the 3rd day of February, 2026. Approved the 5th day of February, 2026. -- T. ----XX----